Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
28-65-323. Administration of deceased ward's estate.

Upon the death of a ward, the guardian of his or her estate is authorized, as such, subject to the direction of the court, to administer the estate of the deceased ward after further letters are issued to him or her, after a hearing, pursuant to a petition for letters, testamentary or of administration, which has been filed not later than forty (40) days after the death of the ward, subject, however, to the provisions of § 28-40-116.

In such a case, the guardian shall file an account of his or her administration of the ward's estate up to the date of the death of the ward and shall cause a notice of the filing of the account to be published combined with a notice to creditors of the deceased ward.

Proceedings for the presentation, allowance, and payment of claims against the estate of the deceased ward shall be governed by the laws relating to claims against decedents' estates, with the guardian serving as personal representative.

Liability on the guardian's bond shall continue and shall apply to the complete administration of the estate of the deceased ward by the guardian.

If letters, testamentary or of administration, are granted to someone other than the guardian upon a petition filed within forty (40) days after the death of the ward, the authority of the guardian to administer the ward's estate shall terminate upon the appointment and qualification of the personal representative, and the guardian shall deliver to the personal representative the assets of the ward's estate remaining in the hands of the guardian.

The probate clerk of the circuit court is entitled to additional fees, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), to cover the initiation of the administration of the ward's estate and, if so initiated, shall direct the personal representative to pay them.

Where the guardian of the wife's estate failed to timely obtain letters of administration within forty days of the wife's death, the guardian failed to comply with §28-65-323 and lost her authority to prosecute an action to contest her husband's will on her behalf.First Sec. Bank v. Estate of Leonard, 369 Ark. 213, 253 S.W.3d 434 (2007).

Because the guardianship terminated at the ward's death, his funeral expenses were not proper expenses of the guardianship.Rogers v. Ritchie, 2017 Ark. App. 420, 528 S.W.3d 272 (2017).

Cross References. Termination of guardianship, §9-26-104.

Am. Jur. 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Guar. & W., §§ 96, 198. 199, 255.

C.J.S. 39 C.J.S., Guar. & W., § 36 et seq.

If the guardianship was solely because of the ward's incompetency for a cause other than minority, by an adjudication of the competency of the ward;

By the death of the ward;

If the guardianship was solely because of the ward's minority, the marriage of the ward shall terminate a guardianship of the person, but not of the estate of the ward except with respect to the ward's earnings for personal services; or

If the guardianship was solely because of the ward's minority, by the ward's reaching the age of majority, unless the guardian receives a guardianship subsidy from the Department of Human Services, then the guardianship is terminated when the ward:

Reaches twenty-one (21) years of age; or

Who is eighteen (18) years of age or older requests termination of the guardianship.

A guardianship may be terminated by court order after such notice as the court may require:

However, if the court finds upon a proper showing by substantial competent evidence that it is in the best interest of the ward that the guardianship be continued after the ward reaches majority, the court may order the guardianship to continue until such time as it may be terminated by order of the court;

If the ward becomes a nonresident of this state; or

If, for any other reason, the guardianship is:

No longer necessary; and

No longer in the best interest of the ward.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (a)(4).

The 2017 amendment added the (b)(3)(A) and (b)(3)(B) designations; substituted “and” for “or for” in (b)(3)(A); and added “No longer in” in (b)(3)(B).

Subdivision (b)(3) of this section plainly states that the method to terminate a guardianship is disjunctive: a guardianship may be terminated by court order if the guardianship is no longer necessary or for the best interest of the ward.Donley v. Donley, 2016 Ark. 243, 493 S.W.3d 762 (2016) (decided before the 2017 amendment).

Because the guardianship terminated at the ward's death, his funeral expenses were not proper expenses of the guardianship.Rogers v. Ritchie, 2017 Ark. App. 420, 528 S.W.3d 272 (2017).

Where a guardian in succession had been appointed as a result of the improper use of ward's funds by original guardian and natural mother, and ward, then 22, ratified such use of funds, which the guardian in succession was attempting to recover from the mother and her bonding company, it was not in the best interests of the ward to continue the guardianship and it was ordered terminated subject to the payment by the mother and the bonding company of any other claim against them and the costs of the guardianship. Continental Ins. Co. v. Estate of Rowan, 252 Ark. 980, 482 S.W.2d 102 (1972) (decision under prior law).

Prior holding that this section allows the court to consider the best interest of the ward in deciding whether to terminate a guardianship and that the rights of the natural parents are not proprietary, would not be interpreted as providing the only guidelines a probate court can consider in terminating a guardianship. Hooks v. Pratte, 53 Ark. App. 161, 920 S.W.2d 24 (1996).

Trial court erred in applying a child custody change in circumstances analysis in deciding a mother's petition to terminate the guardianship of her child by his paternal grandmother because the appropriate standard to be applied in guardianship termination proceedings was the statutory standard set out in subdivision (b)(3) of this section.Graham v. Matheny, 2009 Ark. 481, 346 S.W.3d 273 (2009).

Denial of the mother's petition to terminate guardianship was improper because this section was not applied to her in the least restrictive available method where there was no weight given to her decision to terminate despite the presumption that she acted in her child's best interest. Therefore, the application of this section violated the mother's constitutional right.Troeskyn v. Herrington (In re S.H.), 2012 Ark. 245, 409 S.W.3d 307 (2012), overruled in part, Lineham v. Hyde (In re W.L.), 2015 Ark. 289, 467 S.W.3d 129 (2015).

Circuit court's finding that it remained in the children's best interest to leave the guardianship with the paternal grandparents intact was clearly erroneous where the mother had stable employment, a suitable home, family support, and a close relationship with the children, and overnight visitation had been consistently exercised with no issues other than minor disciplinary disagreements with the paternal grandparents; thus, the fit-parent presumption that the mother had acted in her children's best interest was not rebutted.Hartman v. Reardon (In re E.M.R.), 2019 Ark. 116, 571 S.W.3d 15 (2019).

The fact that an Arkansas guardianship may be terminated if the ward becomes a nonresident of the state constitutes express legislative recognition that guardians may effect a change in residence. King v. Beavers, 148 F.3d 1031 (8th Cir. 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 1002, 119 S. Ct. 513 (1998).

Where a mother erroneously concluded that a minor's marriage emancipated him and that his signed receipt cleared her of liability as his guardian with respect to the father's estate, although the minor was not bound by the signed receipt, and the guardian, before expending the corpus, failed to obtain prior authorization and to file regular reports of expenditures, as required by law, the probate court could properly apply such charges against the minor's claim against his mother-guardian's estate. Shinley v. Ricks, 234 Ark. 767, 354 S.W.2d 547 (1962) (decision under prior law).

Evidence justified a finding that the natural parents voluntarily consented to an order appointing an aunt as the guardian for their daughter and that they asked her to raise the child, and while they did not thereby forfeit their parental rights, the burden was upon them to show that a termination of the guardianship would be in the child's best interest. In re Guardianship of Markham, 32 Ark. App. 46, 795 S.W.2d 931 (1990).

Mother presented sufficient evidence to show that guardianship was no longer necessary and that it would be in child's best interests to terminate the guardianship and reunite him with his mother; she had entered drug treatment program and remained drug-free since leaving that program, she was happily married, and she voluntarily had been sending guardian support money. Hooks v. Pratte, 53 Ark. App. 161, 920 S.W.2d 24 (1996).

Fit parent who consented to a guardianship puts forth sufficient evidence to terminate the guardianship, and meets the burden going forward, by revoking consent and informing the court that the conditions necessitating the guardianship no longer exist; the guardians must rebut the presumption, by clear and convincing evidence, that termination of the guardianship is in the child's best interest, and the court must always consider the parent's right to parent his or her child in that decision.Troesken v. Herrington (In re S.H.), 2015 Ark. 75, 455 S.W.3d 313 (2015), overruled in part, Lineham v. Hyde (In re W.L.), 2015 Ark. 289, 467 S.W.3d 129 (2015).

The rights of parents are not proprietary and are subject to their related duty to care for and protect the child, and the law secures their preferential rights only so long as they discharge their obligations. In re Guardianship of Markham, 32 Ark. App. 46, 795 S.W.2d 931 (1990).

Fit parent is presumed to act in the child's best interest when consenting to the guardianship and, later, when terminating the guardianship; fit, natural parents who consent to a guardianship need additional protection in seeking to terminate the guardianship.Troesken v. Herrington (In re S.H.), 2015 Ark. 75, 455 S.W.3d 313 (2015), overruled in part, Lineham v. Hyde (In re W.L.), 2015 Ark. 289, 467 S.W.3d 129 (2015).

Circuit court erred in applying the two methods set forth in subdivision (b)(3) of this section in a conjunctive manner where the statute plainly stated that the methods were disjunctive. After the termination of the temporary guardianship, when the mother revoked her consent to the guardianship, she was entitled to the fit-parent presumption and the burden shifted to the opposing party to demonstrate that the guardianship was still necessary or in the child's best interest.Donley v. Donley, 2016 Ark. 243, 493 S.W.3d 762 (2016) (decided before the 2017 amendment).

Where a person was adjudicated incompetent because of alcoholism, the status of such a person was presumed to continue until a change was established by proof upon a petition addressed to court. Lester v. Pilkinton, 225 Ark. 349, 282 S.W.2d 590 (1955) (decision under prior law).

In a guardianship termination proceeding, probate court did not err in dismissing alleged natural father as a party where there had never been any adjudication of paternity and where alleged natural father, contending that under Texas law a man was considered the father if his name appeared on the child's birth certificate, never filed a birth certificate stating that he was the father with the Texas court. Hooks v. Pratte, 53 Ark. App. 161, 920 S.W.2d 24 (1996).

Under subdivision (b)(3) of this section, the mother was entitled to the fit-parent presumption that the guardianship of her children with the paternal grandparents was no longer necessary. It was clear from the record that the reasons for the guardianship, i.e., exposure to the former husband's family members and one child's feeling safer at the paternal grandparents'home, no longer existed at the time of the termination hearing, and the circuit court clearly erred in finding that the reason for originally granting the guardianship still existed (mother's former husband was serving sentence for rape of one of the children).Hartman v. Reardon (In re E.M.R.), 2019 Ark. 116, 571 S.W.3d 15 (2019).

Circuit court did not err when it failed to terminate the guardianship of a child by the child's paternal aunt and uncle and to establish the child's maternal grandparent as the guardian of the child because the court considered the testimony of the status of the child's circumstances and made a determination regarding the child's best interest.Smith v. Lovelace, 2014 Ark. App. 345 (2014).

Trial court did not clearly err in denying an individual's petition to terminate a guardianship where he failed to provide persuasive compelling evidence that he was no longer incapacitated or that a guardianship was no longer necessary to protect his best interests, and the trial court was obviously persuaded by a psychologist's professional opinion that the individual was not yet ready to be without the protection afforded by the guardianship.Foster v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2017 Ark. App. 332, 521 S.W.3d 490 (2017).

Father's petition to terminate guardianship was properly denied where he had been found unfit as a parent in the guardianship proceedings, he remained unfit going into the hearing on his petition to terminate the guardianship, and he had invited the error as to whether he was required to prove that guardianship was no longer necessary and in the child's best interests given his attorney's concession at the outset of the petition hearing that the father had the burden to establish that he was a fit parent.Pike v. Shuler (In re L.J.P.), 2019 Ark. App. 456, 588 S.W.3d 58 (2019).

Where an incompetent brought a guardianship termination proceeding, in which she requested the trial court to adjudicate and restore her competency, and the evidence clearly established that the plaintiff was competent to care for herself and her home and had done so for the previous 12 years, the trial court erred in refusing to grant her request because there was no evidence that she suffered from the requisite mental incapacity of unsoundness of mind required to necessitate the appointment of a guardian, notwithstanding the fact that she was unable to properly manage her finances due to her inexperience in such matters. In re Estate of Lemley, 9 Ark. App. 140, 653 S.W.2d 141 (1983) (decision under prior law).

Beneficiary who had reached her majority and was not mentally deficient, emotionally unstable, or suffering from any mental illness can have the guardianship of her estate terminated; the purpose of the guardianship was to protect beneficiary's interests as a minor. In re Estate of Strickland, 50 Ark. App. 7, 902 S.W.2d 238 (1995).

Order dissolving the maternal grandmother's temporary guardianship of a child and awarding custody of the child to her natural father was affirmed because by the time the trial court dissolved the guardianship, the father had remarried and was better able to take on parenting responsibilities.Munn v. Hudson, 2011 Ark. App. 775 (2011).

Child's natural parent who had consented to the guardianship of the child so that she could join the military and who was never found to be unfit as a parent was entitled to have the guardianship terminated because she put forth evidence that the guardianship was no longer necessary, as she had been discharged from the military, and the guardian failed to rebut the presumption that termination was in the child's best interest. The trial court's determination that the guardian did not rebut the presumption that the parent was acting in the child's best interest was not clearly erroneous, particularly because, where the case involved a child, the trial court's evaluation of the witnesses, their testimony, and the best interest of the child was entitled to a high degree of deference.Witham v. Beck, 2013 Ark. App. 351, 428 S.W.3d 537 (2013).

Father, who had a full-time job, was in a three-year committed relationship with his wife, had visited Arkansas 18 times to see the child and communicated with her through phone calls multiple times per week, and had the child for two six-week summer vacations, was a fit parent; thus, the trial court should have terminated the guardianship once the father revoked his consent.Lineham v. Hyde (In re Guardianship of W.L.), 2015 Ark. 289, 467 S.W.3d 129 (2015).

Circuit court erred in denying a a mother's petition to terminate a guardianship because it applied a legal standard that failed to safeguard the mother's fundamental right with respect to the care, custody, and control of her child; when the mother withdrew her consent in her petition to terminate the guardianship and testified that the conditions necessitating the guardianship no longer existed, she met her burden going forward that the guardianship was no longer necessary.Troesken v. Herrington (In re S.H.), 2015 Ark. 75, 455 S.W.3d 313 (2015), overruled in part, Lineham v. Hyde (In re W.L.), 2015 Ark. 289, 467 S.W.3d 129 (2015).

Circuit court erred in denying a a mother's petition to terminate a guardianship because the father's parents failed to rebut the presumption, by clear and convincing evidence, that termination of the guardianship was in the child's best interest; the mother remained a fit parent, which was all that mattered for constitutional purposes, and no evidence was shown that the mother could not also provide the love and affection that the father's parents did.Troesken v. Herrington (In re S.H.), 2015 Ark. 75, 455 S.W.3d 313 (2015), overruled in part, Lineham v. Hyde (In re W.L.), 2015 Ark. 289, 467 S.W.3d 129 (2015).

Natural parent who has not been declared unfit is presumed to act in his or her own child's best interest, and this presumption is applicable when such a parent seeks to terminate an existing guardianship over his or her minor child, in which case a parent's petition to terminate the guardianship need only inform the court that the guardianship is no longer necessary, which is an otherwise fit parent's only burden of proof; once that lack of necessity is communicated to a trial court by a fit parent, the court ordinarily terminates the guardianship, and the guardianship should only remain in place due to some circumstance that could overcome the parent's fundamental right to raise his or her child (decided under former version of subdivision (b)(3) before the 2017 amendment).Morris v. Clark, 2019 Ark. 130, 572 S.W.3d 366 (2019).

Trial court's determination that it is in a minor ward's best interests for a guardianship to remain in place, standing alone, is insufficient to defeat a fit parent's substantive due process interest in raising his or her own child because there is a constitutional presumption that a fit parent acts in his or her child's best interests, so where the parent has not previously been found unfit, weighing best interests at the outset of an inquiry into terminating a guardianship is inappropriate, and the mere fact that a child may have more or better opportunities with another family cannot be enough to keep that child away from an otherwise fit parent (decided under former version of subdivision (b)(3) before the 2017 amendment).Morris v. Clark, 2019 Ark. 130, 572 S.W.3d 366 (2019).

When a parent who has not previously been determined to be unfit petitions for termination of an existing guardianship over his or her minor child, trial courts ordinarily should only decline to terminate the guardianship where the guardian contests the parent's fitness and establishes that the parent is presently unfit, and where an otherwise fit natural parent seeks to terminate an existing guardianship and the parent is not found to be presently unfit, a trial court should dispose of the guardianship routinely (decided under former version of subdivision (b)(3) before the 2017 amendment).Morris v. Clark, 2019 Ark. 130, 572 S.W.3d 366 (2019).

It was error to deny a parent's petition to terminate a guardianship of the parent's child to which the parent had consented because the parent was not found to be unfit, so the parent's preference for what should happen to the child was entitled to special weight (decided under former version of subdivision (b)(3) before the 2017 amendment).Morris v. Clark, 2019 Ark. 130, 572 S.W.3d 366 (2019).

Cited: Crosser v. Henson, 357 Ark. 635, 187 S.W.3d 848 (2004).

Ward has standing to attack a guardianship of his person and estate. Potter ex rel. Redden v. First Nat'l Bank, 292 Ark. 74, 728 S.W.2d 167 (1987).

Attorney has authority to act on ward's behalf. Potter ex rel. Redden v. First Nat'l Bank, 292 Ark. 74, 728 S.W.2d 167 (1987).

The order of confirmation of a guardian's settlement by the probate court was a judgment which could be appealed from, but which could not be otherwise disturbed, except in a court of chancery upon an allegation of fraud or otherwise recognized ground for equitable relief. Hardy v. Hardy, 217 Ark. 296, 230 S.W.2d 6 (1950) (decision under prior law).

When a person for whom a guardian had been appointed as being insane was subsequently adjudged to be sane, a suit for an accounting against the guardian was not within the exclusive jurisdiction of the probate court but could have been maintained in the chancery court. Smith v. Walker, 187 Ark. 161, 58 S.W.2d 946 (1933) (decision under prior law).

The surety on a guardian's bond could not be released from liability thereon except upon full compliance with former similar statute. Nabors v. Quick, 245 Ark. 560, 433 S.W.2d 844 (1968) (decision under prior law).

Ward's claim against a debtor, his former guardian, did not arise until after the ward had obtained an order in state court removing the debtor as guardian and the ward's claim thus arose post-petition and could not be incorporated into the debtor's proposed modified plan.In re Heavner, — B.R. —, 2008 Bankr. LEXIS 3575 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. Aug. 28, 2008).

The provision of former similar statute permitting a probate court to set aside a guardian's settlement for fraud, only if the petition was filed within three years after the guardian's discharge, was drafted to extend the power of the probate court and was not meant to curtail the long recognized power of the chancery court over such settlements. Montgomery v. First Nat'l Bank, 242 Ark. 329, 414 S.W.2d 109 (1967) (decision under prior law).

Effective Dates. Acts 1953, No. 340, § 2: Mar. 28, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas there are many incompetent persons in the State that have no real or personal property and are dependent for their very existence upon the generosity of charitable persons and institutions, or small incomes from pension boards, or small welfare assistance grants; and whereas these persons are often denied assistance until a guardian is appointed; and whereas it is often difficult for a guardian to be appointed for such small sums; and whereas it is essential to the public health, safety and interest that these conditions be remedied, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall be in effect from and after its approval.”

Am. Jur. 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Guar. & W., §§ 5 et seq., 80 et seq.

C.J.S. 39 C.J.S., Guar. & W., § 4.

(1)When a guardianship terminates otherwise than by the death of the ward, the powers of the guardian cease, except that a guardian of the estate may make disbursements for claims that are or may be allowed by the court, for liabilities already properly incurred for the estate or for the ward, and for expenses of administration.

If any person alleges in writing, verified by oath, that any person declared to be incapacitated, or addicted to habitual drunkenness, is no longer incapacitated, or is no longer so addicted, the court in which the proceedings were held shall cause the facts to be inquired into in such manner as it may direct.

If it is found that the person has been restored to capacity or has reformed, he or she shall be discharged from care and custody, and the guardian shall immediately settle his or her accounts and shall restore to the person all things remaining in the guardian's hands belonging or appertaining to him or her.

Upon the guardian of an estate's filing receipts or other evidence satisfactory to the court showing that he or she has delivered to the persons entitled thereto all the property for which he or she is accountable as guardian, the court shall make an order discharging the guardian and his or her surety from further liability or accountability with respect to the guardianship.

The discharge so obtained shall operate as a release from the duties of his or her office which have not previously terminated and shall be final, except that, upon a petition's being filed within three (3) years of the entry thereof, it may be set aside for fraud in the settlement of the account.

The parents of a minor, jointly with equal authority if they are husband and wife living together, or the survivor if one (1) parent is dead, or the competent parent if one (1) is incompetent, or the other parent if one (1) parent is imprisoned for a felony, or the parent to whom the custody of the child has been awarded by a court of competent jurisdiction if the parents are divorced or living apart, or the natural mother of an illegitimate child, shall be the natural guardian of the person of each unmarried minor child of the parents and shall have the care and management of the estate of each such minor derived by gift from the parents or either of them, without the necessity of judicial appointment.

However, upon a showing of a necessity therefor to protect the interests of the minor, the court may appoint a statutory guardian of the estate of the minor, and when appointed and qualified, the statutory guardian shall have exclusive control over the estate of the minor.

The court may appoint the natural guardian as guardian of the estate of the minor.

Where minor daughter had an insurable interest in an automobile, guardian's legal obligation to exercise prudence and due care in managing the estate of the minor gave the guardian an insurable interest in the automobile on behalf of the minor. Beatty v. USAA Cas. Ins. Co., 330 Ark. 354, 954 S.W.2d 250 (1997).

Where a wife, upon divorce, obtained sole custody of an infant son of the parties, she became the sole natural guardian of the son and there was no fiduciary relationship between the husband and the son which would require him to account to the son for the proceeds of a fire insurance policy on a residence held by him in life tenancy with remainder to the son, the insurance having been purchased by the father in his own name and paid for by him. Barner v. Barner, 241 Ark. 370, 407 S.W.2d 747 (1966) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 48; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-867; Acts 1991, No. 957, § 1; 1997, No. 513, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Termination of Guardianship

28-65-401. Termination generally.

A guardianship is terminated:

(A)If the guardianship was solely because of the ward's minority, and either the ward attains his or her majority or the disability of minority of the ward is removed for all purposes by a court of competent jurisdiction.

When a guardianship terminates by the death of the ward, the guardian of the estate may proceed under §28-65-323, but the rights of all creditors against the ward's estate shall be determined by the law governing decedents' estates.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 45; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-864; Acts 2013, No. 577, § 4; 2017, No. 717, § 1.

Parties.

28-65-402. Restoration of capacity of ward.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, §§ 46, 47; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 57-865, 57-866.

28-65-403. Discharge of guardian and surety.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 49; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-868.

Subchapter 5

— Dispensing with Guardianship

28-65-501. Dispensing with guardianship generally.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940; § 50; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-869.

28-65-502. Dispensing with guardianship in small estate.

When the whole estate of a minor or an incompetent does not exceed the value of five thousand dollars ($5,000), the court, in its discretion, without the appointment of a guardian or the giving of bond, may authorize the payment or delivery of all or any part of the estate to the minor or incompetent or to some suitable person, institution, or agency for him or her, to be retained, used, expended, distributed, or disposed of for the benefit of the minor or incompetent as the court may direct.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 50; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-869; Acts 1993, No. 105, § 1.

28-65-503. Ward receiving public assistance.

The circuit court in its discretion, without the appointment of a guardian or the giving of bond, may authorize the payment and delivery of any moneys or other property due or that may in the future become due the minor or incompetent person to some suitable person, institution, or agency for the minor or incompetent person, to be retained, used, expended, distributed, or disposed of, for the benefit of the minor or incompetent person as the court may direct, in cases in which:

The present total value of the personal property of a minor or an incompetent person is less than one hundred dollars ($100);

The minor or incompetent person owns no real property;

The minor or incompetent person should have a guardian to care for his or her needs; and

The minor or incompetent person is supported in whole or in part by a monthly income from the Department ofHuman Services, pension boards, or any other person or agency except the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

In the event the moneys or other property of the minor or incompetent person accumulates to a total value of five hundred dollars ($500) or more, the suitable person shall immediately report that fact to the circuit court.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Dicker, Symposium on Developmental Disabilities and the Law — Guardianship: Overcoming the Last Hurdle to Civil Rights for the Mentally Disabled, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 485.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, No. 159, § 1: Jan. 1, 2012.

To remove the property to the domicile of the guardian and his or her ward;

To sell, mortgage, lease, or exchange the property of his or her ward or to take any other action with reference thereto which a locally appointed guardian would be authorized to take and to remove the proceeds to the domicile of the guardian and his or her ward; or

To bring the action in behalf of his or her ward.

If the court orders the termination of the local guardianship, the local guardian shall file his or her account immediately.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 340, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-646.1; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 117.

Subchapter 6

— Foreign Guardians

28-65-601. Petition to act in Arkansas.

If an incompetent person who is a resident of another state, a territory of the United States, or the District of Columbia has a guardian, curator, conservator, committee, tutor, or other person authorized by the laws of the other jurisdiction to have possession and control of the property of the incompetent person, such a person being hereinafter referred to as “foreign guardian”, the foreign guardian may petition the circuit court of the county of this state in which a guardianship of the estate of the incompetent person is pending, or, if no such guardianship is pending in this state, of any county in which there is property belonging to his or her ward, or in which a cause of action in behalf of his or her ward may be lawfully brought, for authority:

The foreign guardian shall file with his or her petition an authenticated copy of his or her letters of guardianship, or other appropriate evidence of his or her appointment and qualification, an authenticated copy of the bond, if any, filed by him or her with the court which appointed him or her, and evidence of the value of the property of the ward in the jurisdiction of his or her appointment.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 51; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-870.

28-65-602. Grant or denial of petition to act in Arkansas — Effect.

Upon being satisfied that the foreign guardian is duly appointed, qualified, and acting, that his or her bond is sufficient under the laws of the jurisdiction of his or her appointment to protect the property of the ward within the jurisdiction and the property within this state, or its proceeds, or that no bond is required in the jurisdiction of his or her appointment, and that the action ordered to be taken is in the best interest of the ward and his or her estate, the court may, if there is no locally appointed guardian, grant the petition, in whole or in part, and direct the foreign guardian to proceed with the directed action in the same manner as is provided for similar action by a resident guardian of the estate or a resident ward.

If there is a locally appointed guardian, and upon the same findings as to the qualifications of the foreign guardian and the sufficiency of his or her bond, if any, the court, in the exercise of its discretion, may:

Order the termination of the local guardianship and the payment, transfer, or delivery of the property of the ward to the foreign guardian and grant the petition of the foreign guardian, in whole or in part; or

Order the local guardian to take the action, in whole or in part, for which the foreign guardian asked authority; or

Deny the petition.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 51; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-870.

28-65-603. Corporate guardians.

If the foreign guardian is a corporation, it need not qualify as a corporation to do business under the general corporation laws of this state to entitle it to administer the property of its ward situated in this state.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 51; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-870.

28-65-604. Applicability.

This subchapter does not apply to foreign guardianships under the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, §28-74-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 159, § 4.

Subchapter 7

— Public Guardian for Adults

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 862, § 1, provided:

“Legislative findings.

“The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Many adults lack the capacity to provide informed consent to necessary health care, have not executed an advance health care directive or a durable power of attorney, and have no friend or family member qualified and willing to consent on their behalf; and

“(2)It is therefore necessary for the preservation of the public health and safety to provide for a public guardian who can make informed consent to needed medical and long-term care on behalf of incapacitated adults who are unable to consent for themselves and for whom there is no other person qualified and willing to consent.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, No. 862, § 5, provided: “Contingent Effectiveness. This act shall take effect upon the occurrence of the following: (1) The Director of the Division of Aging and Adult Services of the Department of Health and Human Services determines that adequate appropriation, funding, and positions are available to carry out a public guardianship program for adults; and (2) The director appoints an employee of the Division of Aging and Adult Services to serve as Public Guardian for Adults.” This contingency is deemed to have been met by Acts 2009, No. 433.

28-65-701. Office of Public Guardian for Adults — Creation.

The Office of Public Guardian for Adults is created.

The Public Guardian for Adults shall be the administrator of the office.

The Public Guardian for Adults:

May consent or withhold consent to health and long-term care treatment;

Shall advocate for the ward; and

Shall be functionally separate from and share no duties with any department employee whose job it is to prepare and offer services or treatment plans, or both, to any person.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment redesignated and rewrote former (a) as (a)(1); added (a)(2); and substituted “department” for “division” in (b)(1)(B) and (C).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Aging and Adult Services” in (a)(2).

Meet the same qualifications as required for the Public Guardian for Adults in § 28-65-702;

Have the same power and duties as the Public Guardian for Adults except those related to the administration and organization of the Office of Public Guardian for Adults; and

May act on behalf of the Public Guardian for Adults in matters related to guardianships held by the Public Guardian for Adults; and

(A)May accept the services of volunteers who shall possess all of the qualifications of a guardian required under §28-65-203.

If approved by the Public Guardian for Adults, the volunteer shall be reimbursed for expenses in the same manner as public employees.

A volunteer shall not be an employee of any facility or program that provides services to the ward.

Volunteers shall not be related to the owner or any staff member of any facility or program that provides services to the ward.

(1)The Public Guardian for Adults shall receive and review referrals for adult guardianship.

The Public Guardian for Adults may petition to be appointed guardian of the person of an adult or guardian of the estate of an adult, or both, if:

A circuit court determines that the Public Guardian for Adults would be a suitable guardian for the incapacitated adult.

If requested by the court having jurisdiction of the ward, the Public Guardian for Adults may petition to intervene in an established guardianship and petition to be named a successor guardian if all of the following conditions are met:

The Public Guardian for Adults determines that the current guardian is unable or unwilling to perform his or her duties under the guardianship;

There is no suitable private guardian qualified and willing to accept the guardianship appointment; and

A circuit court determines that the Public Guardian for Adults would be a suitable guardian for the incapacitated adult.

The Public Guardian for Adults either directly or through staff or volunteered services shall monitor each ward and each ward's care and progress on a continuing basis.

The monitoring shall include quarterly personal contact with each ward.

A written record shall be created and maintained concerning each personal contact and shall contain the information specified in § 28-65-322.

The Public Guardian for Adults shall keep and maintain financial, case control, and statistical records in accordance with generally accepted professional business and accounting standards in all cases for which the Office of Public Guardian for Adults has been appointed guardian.

Office records that identify individuals for whom the office has provided guardianship services shall be kept confidential except to the extent that disclosure is required by other laws.

Office records shall be retained in accordance with state record retention rules.

Unless specifically provided otherwise in this subchapter, this chapter is applicable to any guardianship established under this subchapter.

Upon petition by the Department of Human Services, a court may direct payment from the assets of the ward for services rendered or goods purchased by or for the ward during the course of the guardianship.

Notwithstanding the requirement of § 28-51-303(b)(2)(A), the court may allow the sale of a ward's property at public auction for less than three-fourths (3/4) of the appraised value.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(2); redesignated former (b) as (b)(1); added (b)(2); and substituted “estate” for “property” in the introductory language of (c).

The 2015 amendment added (h).

History.

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 4.